District of Columbia statutes.
16-3110

Order admitting will to probate as conclusive evidence.

With respect to the trial of issues in the Probate Court, including the taking and use of testimony of non-resident witnesses, the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, unless otherwise provided by law, are applicable thereto. A final order or decree admitting a will to probate, unless and until it is reversed, is conclusive evidence of the validity of the will in a collateral proceeding in which the will is brought into question, and a transcript of the record of the will, and of the decree admitting it to probate, is sufficient proof thereof.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 601, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 5(c), 27 DCR 2900
1981 Ed., § 16-3110.
1973 Ed., § 16-3111.